New Jersey, session 221, S4411.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  For the purposes of this section: Authority means the New Jersey Turnpike Authority established by section 3 of P.L.1948, c.454 (C.27:23-3). Disabled veteran shall have the same meaning as provided in section 1 of P.L.1979, c.457 (C.39:3-27.15). Electronic toll collection system means the electronic system employed or utilized by the authority to register and collect the toll required to be paid for a vehicle entering a toll plaza owned or operated by, on behalf of, the authority. b.    Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the New Jersey Turnpike Authority shall establish and maintain a program to exempt disabled veterans from tolls collected by or on behalf of the authority by means of an electronic toll collection system.  Under the program, a disabled veteran may apply for an exemption from tolls pursuant to this subsection for a motor vehicle that: (1) is owned or leased by a disabled veteran; (2) is registered in the State of New Jersey and displays a license plate bearing the term Disabled Vet that was issued for the motor vehicle pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1979, c.457 (C.39:3-27.15); and (3) has an active New Jersey electronic toll collection system account for the motor vehicle. c.       To qualify for the toll exemption program established pursuant to subsection b. of this section, a disabled veteran shall first apply for a license plate bearing the term Disabled Vet as issued pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1979, c.457 (C.39:3-27.15) before applying for the toll exemption program.  If the application for a license plate bearing the term Disabled Vet by a disabled veteran is approved by the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission, the disabled veteran may then apply for the toll exemption program. The authority shall approve the application for the toll exemption program of any disabled veteran who is in possession of and approved for a license plate bearing the term Disabled Vet issued pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1979, c.457 (C.39:3-27.15). 2.    a.  For the purposes of this section: Authority means the South Jersey Transportation Authority established by section 4 of P.L.1991, c.252 (C.27:25A-4). Disabled veteran shall have the same meaning as provided in section 1 of P.L.1979, c.457 (C.39:3-27.15). Electronic toll collection system means the electronic system employed or utilized by the authority to register and collect the toll required to be paid for a vehicle entering a toll plaza owned or operated by, on behalf of, the authority. b.    Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the South Jersey Transportation Authority shall establish and maintain a program to exempt disabled veterans from tolls collected by or on behalf of the authority by means of an electronic toll collection system.  Under the program, a disabled veteran may apply for an exemption from tolls pursuant to this subsection for a motor vehicle that: (1) is owned or leased by a disabled veteran; (2) is registered in the State of New Jersey and displays a license plate bearing the term Disabled Vet that was issued for the motor vehicle pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1979, c.457 (C.39:3-27.15); and (3) has an active New Jersey electronic toll collection system account for the motor vehicle. c.     To qualify for the toll exemption program established pursuant to subsection b. of this section, a disabled veteran shall first apply for a license plate bearing the term Disabled Vet as issued pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1979, c.457 (C.39:3-27.15) before applying for the toll exemption program.  If the application for a license plate bearing the term Disabled Vet by a disabled veteran is approved by the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission, the disabled veteran may then apply for the toll exemption program. The authority shall approve the application for the toll exemption program of any disabled veteran who is in possession of and approved for a license plate bearing the term Disabled Vet and issued pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1979, c.457 (C.39:3-27.15). 3.    This act shall take effect 90 days following the date of enactment.